Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 36.54.120 and 2003 c 83 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:A ferry district may construct, purchase, operate, and maintain ((passenger-only)) ferries or wharves at any unfordable stream, lake, estuary, or bay within or bordering the ferry district, or between portions of the ferry district, or between the ferry district and other ferry districts, together with all the necessary boats, grounds, roads, approaches, and landings appertaining thereto under the direction and control of the governing body of the ferry district, free or for toll as the governing body determines by resolution.Sec. 2. RCW 36.54.130 and 2009 c 551 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) To carry out the purposes for which ferry districts are created, the governing body of a ferry district may levy each year an ad valorem tax on all taxable property located in the district not to exceed ((seventy-five))75 cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, except a ferry district in a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 or more may not levy at a rate that exceeds seven and one-half cents per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of assessed value. The levy must be sufficient for the provision of ferry services as shown to be required by the budget prepared by the governing body of the ferry district.(2) A tax imposed under this section may be used only for:(a) Providing ferry services, including the purchase, lease, or rental of ferry vessels and dock facilities;(b) The operation, maintenance, and improvement of ferry vessels and dock facilities;(c) Providing shuttle services between the ferry terminal and passenger parking facilities, and other landside improvements directly related to the provision of ((passenger-only)) ferry service; and(d) Related personnel costs.Sec. 3. RCW 36.54.135 and 2007 c 223 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A county ferry district may incur general indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds, to finance the construction, purchase, and preservation of ((passenger-only)) ferries and associated terminals and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part from the revenues received from the tax levy authorized in RCW 36.54.130.(2) The ordinance adopted by the county legislative authority creating the county ferry district and authorizing the use of revenues received from the tax levy authorized in RCW 36.54.130 must indicate an intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated.Sec. 4. RCW 47.60.120 and 2003 c 83 s 204 and 2003 c 373 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) If the department acquires or constructs, maintains, and operates any ferry crossings upon or toll bridges over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or connecting waters, there shall not be constructed, operated, or maintained any other ferry crossing upon or bridge over any such waters within ((ten))10 miles of any such crossing or bridge operated or maintained by the department excepting such bridges or ferry crossings in existence, and being operated and maintained under a lawfully issued franchise at the time of the location of the ferry crossing or construction of the toll bridge by the department.(2) The ((ten-mile))10-mile distance in subsection (1) of this section means ((ten))10 statute miles measured by airline distance. The ((ten-mile))10-mile restriction shall be applied by comparing the two end points (termini) of a state ferry crossing to those of a private ferry crossing.(3) The Washington utilities and transportation commission may, upon written petition of a commercial ferry operator certificated or applying for certification under chapter 81.84 RCW, and upon notice and hearing, grant a waiver from the ((ten-mile))10-mile restriction. The waiver must not be detrimental to the public interest. In making a decision to waive the ((ten-mile))10-mile restriction, the commission shall consider, but is not limited to, the impact of the waiver on transportation congestion mitigation, air quality improvement, and the overall impact on the Washington state ferry system. The commission shall act upon a request for a waiver within ((ninety))90 days after the conclusion of the hearing. A waiver is effective for a period of five years from the date of issuance. At the end of five years the waiver becomes permanent unless appealed within ((thirty))30 days by the commission on its own motion, the department, or an interested party.(4) The department shall not maintain and operate any ferry crossing or toll bridge over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or connecting waters that would infringe upon any franchise lawfully issued by the state and in existence and being exercised at the time of the location of the ferry crossing or toll bridge by the department, without first acquiring the rights granted to such franchise holder under the franchise.(5) This section does not apply to the operation of passenger-only ferry service by public transportation benefit areas meeting the requirements of RCW 36.57A.200 or to the operation of ((passenger-only)) ferry service by ferry districts.--- END ---